Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1075.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 705(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 705. Price paid for acquisitions and improvements.(a) Game lands.--[(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the commission may pay for lands to be used as game lands what it considers a fair and reasonable price not to exceed $400 per acre exclusive of Federal and other cost-sharing funds and consistent with the market value of land in the locality in which the game land is located.](2) The commission may pay for lands to be used as game lands [in a county of the second class] what it considers a fair and reasonable price exclusive of Federal and other 123456789101112131415161718 cost-sharing funds and consistent with the market value of land in the locality in which the game land is located.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1075PN1174 - 2 - 1234